src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Norwegian Nynorsk language
! Copyright © 2015 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
! !!            !!!Norwegian Nynorsk morphological analyser                  !
! ========================================================================== !

! =====================
! LEXICA FOR VERB ROOTS
! =====================

! ------------
! Strong verbs
! ------------

LEXICON VsV01
 # ;

LEXICON VsV01V04
 # ;

LEXICON VsV04
 # ;

LEXICON VsV04d
 # ;

LEXICON VsV07d
 # ;

LEXICON VsV07x
 # ;

LEXICON VsV08
 # ;

LEXICON VsV08k
 # ;

LEXICON VsV09k
 # ;

! ----------
! Weak verbs
! ----------

LEXICON V00V01
 # ;

LEXICON V00V01V04
 # ;

LEXICON V00V04
 # ;

! Ordbank mapping: 001, 001K1, 005 -> V01
LEXICON V01
 0: INF-PRS-PTC ;
 0: a-PRES ;
 0: a-PRET-PTC ;

LEXICON V01V02o
 # ;

LEXICON V01V04
 # ;

LEXICON V01V04d
 # ;

LEXICON V01V04V05
 # ;

! Ordbank mapping: 393, 393T -> V01V04x
LEXICON V01V04x
 # ;

LEXICON V01V05
 # ;

LEXICON V01V05d
 # ;

LEXICON V01V05j
 # ;

LEXICON V01V06
 # ;

LEXICON V01V06d
 # ;

LEXICON V01V06x
 # ;

LEXICON V01V07
 # ;

LEXICON V01V07d
 # ;

LEXICON V01V07dj
 # ;

LEXICON V01V07x
 # ;

LEXICON V01V08
 # ;

LEXICON V01V08d
 # ;

LEXICON V01V08x
 # ;

LEXICON V01V09
 # ;

LEXICON V01xV09k
 # ;

LEXICON V02 ! skilje
 0: INF-PRS-PTC ;
 0: a-PRES ;
 0: de-PRET-PTC ;

 # ;

! Ordbank mapping: 130 -> V02o
LEXICON V02o
 # ;

LEXICON V02s
 # ;

LEXICON V02u
 # ;

! Ordbank mapping: 106, 111 -> V02x
LEXICON V02x
 # ;

! Ordbank mapping: 113 -> V03
LEXICON V03
 # ;

! Ordbank mapping: 042 -> V03d
LEXICON V03d
 # ;

! Ordbank mapping: 037, 037K1 -> V04
LEXICON V04
 0: INF-PRS-PTC ;
 0: e-PRES ;
 0: t-PRET-PTC ;

LEXICON V04d
 # ;

! Ordbank mapping: 049 -> V04dj
LEXICON V04dj
 # ;

LEXICON V04djo
 # ;

LEXICON V04djV04djo
 # ;

LEXICON V04dV04do
 # ;

LEXICON V04dV05d
 # ;

! Ordbank mapping: 045 -> V04j
LEXICON V04j
 # ;

LEXICON V04n
 # ;

LEXICON V04r
 # ;

!LEXICON V04rNN011k
! # ;

LEXICON V04V0
 # ;

LEXICON V04V05
 # ;

LEXICON V05
 # ;

LEXICON V05d
 # ;

LEXICON V05j
 # ;

LEXICON V06
 # ;

LEXICON V06d
 # ;

LEXICON V06j
 # ;

LEXICON V06jx
 # ;

LEXICON V06o
 # ;

LEXICON V06x
 # ;

LEXICON V07
 # ;

LEXICON V07d
 # ;

LEXICON V07dj
 # ;

LEXICON V07j
 # ;

LEXICON V07x
 # ;

LEXICON V08
 # ;

! Ordbank mapping: 098 -> V08k
LEXICON V08k
 INF-PRS-PTC ;
 r-PRES ;
 dd-PRET-PTC ;

! Ordbank mapping: 094, 094K1, 095, 095K1 -> V09
LEXICON V09
 # ;

! Ordbank mapping: 090, 090K1, 091, 091K1 -> V09k
LEXICON V09k
 INF-PRS-PTC ;
 r-PRES ;
 dd-PRET-PTC ;

! ------------------------
! Verbal inflection lexica
! ------------------------

LEXICON INF-PRS-PTC
 +Inf: # ;
 +PrsPtc:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON a-PRES
 +Ind+Prs:%>ar # ;

LEXICON a-PRET-PTC
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>a # ;

LEXICON e-PRES
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;

LEXICON t-PRET-PTC
 +Ind+Prt:%>t # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>te # ;

LEXICON r-PRES
 +Ind+Prs:%>r # ;

LEXICON dd-PRET-PTC
 +Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dd # ;

LEXICON de-PRET-PTC
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>d # ;

LEXICON 001
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ar # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>a # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>a # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>a # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>a # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>a # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 001K1
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ar # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>as # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>a # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>a # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>a # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>a # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>a # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 005
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ar # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>a # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>a # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>a # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>a # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>a # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 005K1
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ar # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>as # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>a # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>a # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>a # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>a # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>a # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 015
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 015K1
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>as # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 015X
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%> # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>t # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 019
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 019K1
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>as # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 023
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 023K1
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>as # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 027
 +Inf:%>je # ;
 +Inf:%>ja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>jer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>jande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 027K1
 +Inf:%>je # ;
 +Inf:%>ja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>jer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>t # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>t # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>jande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 028
 +Inf:%>je # ;
 +Inf:%>ja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>jer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>jande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 028K1
 +Inf:%>je # ;
 +Inf:%>ja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>jer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>jande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 030
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 030K1
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>as # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;
