src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
blygje+V:blyg 028 ; ! LEMMA_ID=8393
forlengje+V:forleng 027 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24553
forrenne+V:forren 019 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24848
frådømme+V:frådøm 023 ; ! LEMMA_ID=27167
glø+V:glø V08k ; ! LEMMA_ID=31348
høyre+V:høyr 015 ; ! LEMMA_ID=39754
irettesetje+V:iretteset V03 ; ! LEMMA_ID=42180
irettesette+V:iretteset V03d ; ! LEMMA_ID=42181
klinkbygge+V:klinkbyg 019 ; ! LEMMA_ID=47475
krengje+V:kreng 027 ; ! LEMMA_ID=50780
kvekkje+V:kvek V04dj ; ! LEMMA_ID=52654
leive+V:leiv 030 ; ! LEMMA_ID=54892
lugge+V:lugg V01 ; ! LEMMA_ID=57000
løne+V:løn V04 ; ! LEMMA_ID=58109
opphøgje+V:opphøg 028 ; ! LEMMA_ID=67088
postlegge+V:postl V02x ; ! LEMMA_ID=71008
reie+V:rei V09 ; ! LEMMA_ID=73988
sandstrø+V:sandstrø V09k ; ! LEMMA_ID=77769
skjemme+V:skjem 023 ; ! LEMMA_ID=82421
skyme+V:skym 015 ; ! LEMMA_ID=84923
smugrøykje+V:smugrøyk V04j ; ! LEMMA_ID=86332
spa+V:spa V08k ; ! LEMMA_ID=87937
stålsetje+V:stålset V03 ; ! LEMMA_ID=91854
stålsette+V:stålset V03d ; ! LEMMA_ID=91855
sørgje+V:sørg 027 ; ! LEMMA_ID=93899
tekkje+V:tek V04dj ; ! LEMMA_ID=95174
tidfeste+V:tidfest V01V04x ; ! LEMMA_ID=96038
tjuvkjenne+V:tjuvkjen 019 ; ! LEMMA_ID=97089
æreskjemme+V:æreskjem 023 ; ! LEMMA_ID=113557
ørske+V:ørsk V01 ; ! LEMMA_ID=113994
øygje+V:øyg 028 ; ! LEMMA_ID=114114
mune+V:mun 015X ; ! LEMMA_ID=123259
ynge+V:yng 015 ; ! LEMMA_ID=123293
behøve+V:behøv 030 ; ! LEMMA_ID=125689
sandstrøye+V:sandstrøy V09 ; ! LEMMA_ID=130898
oppsummere+V:oppsummer V04 ; ! LEMMA_ID=131509
LEXICON regular-verb
brydde	V01V08x  ;
degge	V01V07d  ;
dibbe	V01V05d  ;
forfremme	V01V06d  ;
forlove	V00V01 ;
fremme	V01V06d  ;
grue	V01V09  ;
heve	V01V07x  ;
hudflette	V01V04d  ;
hyrgje	V01V05j  ;
høljeregne	V01V06  ;
kike	VsV01 ;
lovfeste	V01V04x  ;
pile	V01V04 ;
pryde	V01V08  ;
ruve	V01V07  ;
sigle	V01V06  ;
sike	VsV01V04 ;
skave	VsV01 ;
skjerde	V01V06x  ;
skru	V01xV09k  ;
skrue	V01V09  ;
storregne	V01V05 ;
støvsuge	VsV01 ;
sveive	V01V07x  ;
tagge	V01 ;
trette	V01V04d  ;
trygge	V01V07d  ;
tryggje	V01V07dj  ;
tøve	V01V07  ;
tøyre	V01V04V05 ;
varmhevje	VsV01 ;
verje	V01V02o  ;
volde	V00V01V04 ;
ydde	V01V08d  ;
brulegge	V02x  ;
dugliggjøre	V02o  ;
kylje	V02 ;
mistenkeliggjøre	V02o  ;
rysje	V02u  ;
rysje	V02u  ;
selje	V02 ;
sinkleggje	V02x  ;
tysje	V02u  ;
umenneskjeliggjøre	V02o  ;
underselje	V02 ;
verje	V01V02o  ;
vevje	V02s  ;
motsetje	V03 ;
pukksette	V03d  ;
bestemme	V04dV05d  ;
bevare	V04r   ;
blenge	V04n  ;
endestupe	VsV04 ;
flekke	V04dV04do  ;
flekke	V04dV04do  ;
flekkje	V04djo  ;
fordøme	V00V04 ;
forspille	V04d  ;
føne	V01V04 ;
førehandsdøme	V00V04 ;
gine	VsV01V04 ;
gyte	VsV04 ;
hykje	V04j  ;
kroppsvisitere	V04 ;
krossfeste	V01V04x  ;
krykke	V04d  ;
nykkje	V04dj  ;
sike	VsV01V04 ;
skjelle	VsV04d  ;
skjøre	V04V05 ;
skrelle	V01V04d  ;
sprene	V01V04 ;
straffedøme	V00V04 ;
strekke	V04dV04do  ;
strekkje	V04djV04djo  ;
stupe	VsV04 ;
støyre	V04V0 ;
svekke	V04d  ;
syre	V01V04V05 ;
utmerkje	V04j  ;
volde	V00V01V04 ;
bestemme	V04dV05d  ;
dibbe	V01V05d  ;
finregne	V01V05 ;
forhøyre	V05 ;
forsyrgje	V05j  ;
gapflire	V04V05 ;
glattkjemme	V05d  ;
hyrgje	V01V05j  ;
krengje	V05j  ;
kryssforhøyre	V05 ;
slemme	V05d  ;
striregne	V01V05 ;
sture	V01V04V05 ;
tildømme	V05d  ;
tomkøyre	V05 ;
tære	V04V05 ;
vrengje	V05j  ;
avherde	V01V06x  ;
forbrenne	V06d  ;
forfremme	V01V06d  ;
forvrengje	V06j  ;
friskmelde	V06x  ;
glåme	V06  ;
godkjenne	V06d  ;
lengje	V06j  ;
livskræme	V06x  ;
negle	V01V06  ;
råkøyre	V06  ;
skylde	V01V06x  ;
sprengje	V06j  ;
straffedømme	V06d  ;
temme	V06o  ;
tvikøyre	V06  ;
unngjelde	V06x  ;
ynge	V06jx  ;
bryggje	V01V07dj  ;
bygge	V07d  ;
bægje	V07j  ;
degge	V01V07d  ;
fordryge	V07  ;
forhøgje	V07j  ;
framleige	V07x  ;
førebyggje	V07dj  ;
glygge	V07d  ;
halshogge	VsV07d  ;
heve	V01V07x  ;
hive	VsV07x  ;
kanthogge	VsV07d  ;
kravellbyggje	V07dj  ;
leige	V07  ;
leive	V07x  ;
sive	VsV07x  ;
skygge	V07d  ;
slettbyggje	V07dj  ;
streve	V01V07  ;
svæve	V07x  ;
søgje	V07j  ;
topphogge	VsV07d  ;
tryggje	V01V07dj  ;
underbygge	V07  ;
brydde	V01V08x  ;
forvride	VsV08  ;
gjennomarbeide	V08  ;
gle	V08k  ;
gni	VsV08k  ;
knòde	V01V08  ;
lode	V08  ;
misbyde	VsV08  ;
pryde	V01V08  ;
påby	VsV08k  ;
svi	VsV08k  ;
svide	VsV08  ;
tyde	V08  ;
ydde	V01V08d  ;
dy	V09k  ;
meie	V01V09  ;
ry	VsV09k  ;
skru	V01xV09k  ;
sky	V09k  ;
trøye	V09  ;
trå	VsV09k  ;
